Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. School Food Programs

§ 1261.
Repealed.
1969, No. 21, § 4.

§ 1261a.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Food programs” means provision of food to persons under programs meeting standards for assistance under the National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq., and in the Child Nutrition Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1771 et seq., each as amended.

“School board” means the governing body responsible for the administration of a public school.

“Independent school board” means a governing body responsible for the administration of a nonprofit independent school exempt from United States income taxes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 21

, § 1; amended

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

2011, No. 58

, § 22, eff. May 31, 2011;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 75;

2021, No. 20

, § 60.

§ 1262.
Repealed.
1969, No. 21, § 4.

§ 1262a.
Award of grants.

The Agency may, from funds appropriated for this subsection to the Agency, award grants to:
(a) (1) The Agency may, from funds appropriated for this subsection to the Agency, award grants to:

supervisory unions for the use of member school boards that establish and operate food programs;

independent school boards that establish and operate food programs; and

approved education programs, as defined in subdivision 11(a)(34) of this title and operating under private nonprofit ownership as defined in the National School Lunch Act, that establish and operate food programs for students engaged in a teen parent education program or students enrolled in a Vermont public school.

The amount of any grant awarded under this subsection shall not be more than the amount necessary, in addition to any reimbursement from federal funds, to pay the actual cost of the meal.

The Agency may, from funds available to the Agency for this subsection, award grants to supervisory unions consisting of one or more school districts that need to initiate or expand food programs in order to meet the requirements of section 1264 of this title and that seek assistance in meeting the cost of initiation or expansion. The amount of the grants shall be limited to 75 percent of the cost deemed necessary by the Secretary to construct, renovate, or acquire additional facilities and equipment to provide lunches to all students, and shall be reduced by the amount of funds available from federal or other sources, including those funds available under section 3448 of this title. The Agency shall direct supervisory unions seeking grants under this section to share facilities and equipment within the supervisory union and with other supervisory unions for the provision of lunches wherever more efficient and effective operation of food programs can be expected to result.

On a quarterly basis, from State funds appropriated to the Agency for this subsection, the Agency shall award to each supervisory union, independent school board, and approved education program as described in subsection (a) of this section a sum equal to the amount that would have been the student share of the cost of all breakfasts and lunches actually provided in the district during the previous quarter to students eligible for a reduced-price breakfast under the federal school breakfast program and students eligible for a reduced-price lunch under the federal school lunch program.

The Agency shall, from funds appropriated for this subsection to the Agency, award grants to supervisory unions and supervisory districts in accordance with section 1264a of this title (locally produced foods). If the amount appropriated for this purpose is insufficient to fully fund the grants under that section, then the grant amounts that are awarded shall be prorated.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 21

, § 2; amended

1973, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.027;

2011, No. 58

, § 22, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 50

, § E.501.1;

2021, No. 67

, § 5, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 1262b.
Rules.

The State Board shall adopt rules governing grants under section 1262a of this title. The rules shall provide for grants from State funds in accordance with federal guidelines for food programs. The State Board may adopt other rules that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 21

, § 3; amended

1971, No. 29

;

1973, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 58

, § 22, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 131, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1263.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 1264.
Food program.

Each school board operating a public school shall cause to operate within the school district a food program that makes available a school lunch, as provided in the National School Lunch Act as amended, and a school breakfast, as provided in the National Child Nutrition Act as amended, to each attending student every school day.
(a) (1) Each school board operating a public school shall cause to operate within the school district a food program that makes available a school lunch, as provided in the National School Lunch Act as amended, and a school breakfast, as provided in the National Child Nutrition Act as amended, to each attending student every school day.

Each school board operating a public school shall offer a summer snack or meals program funded by the Summer Food Service program or the National School Lunch Program for participants in a summer educational or recreational program or camp if:

at least 50 percent of the students in a school in the district were eligible for free or reduced-price meals under subdivision (1) of this subsection for at least one month in the preceding academic year;

the district operates or funds the summer educational or recreational program or camp; and

the summer educational or recreational program or camp is offered 15 or more hours per week.

In the event of an emergency, the school board may apply to the Secretary for a temporary waiver of the requirements in subsection (a) of this section. The Secretary shall grant the requested waiver if he or she finds that it is unduly difficult for the school district to provide a school lunch, breakfast, or summer meals program, or any combination of the three, and if he or she finds that the school district and supervisory union have exercised due diligence to avoid the emergency situation that gives rise to the need for the requested waiver. In no event shall the waiver extend for a period to exceed 20 school days or, in the case of a summer meals program, the remainder of the summer vacation.

The State shall be responsible for the student share of the cost of breakfasts provided to all students eligible for a reduced-price breakfast under the federal school breakfast program and for the student share of the cost of lunches provided to all students eligible for a reduced-price lunch under the federal school lunch program.

, (e)[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2003, No. 22

, § 1;

2007, No. 192

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.028;

2009, No. 87

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 28, 2010;

2011, No. 58

, § 22, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 50

, § E.501.2;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 132, Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 34

, § 4;

2021, No. 67

, § 6, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 1264a.
Locally produced foods.

It is a goal of the State that by the year 2023, at least 20 percent of all foods purchased by supervisory unions and supervisory districts, together referred to in this section as “supervisory unions,” be locally produced foods. School boards have the discretion to define what foods are included within the definition of “locally produced foods” for the purposes of this subsection and subsection (b) of this section.

On or before December 31, 2021 and annually thereafter, a school board operating a school lunch, breakfast, or summer meals program shall report to the Agency of Education an estimate of the percentage of the cost of all foods purchased by the school board for those programs that were locally produced foods during the one-year period ending on June 30 of that year.

Beginning with the 2021-22 school year and thereafter, supervisory unions shall be eligible for a local foods incentive grant (grant) from funds appropriated to the Agency of Education for this purpose.
(c) (1) Beginning with the 2021-22 school year and thereafter, supervisory unions shall be eligible for a local foods incentive grant (grant) from funds appropriated to the Agency of Education for this purpose.

A supervisory union may apply for the grant if it has:

developed a locally produced foods purchasing plan that describes the supervisory union’s goals for purchasing locally produced foods and its plan to achieve those goals;

designated an individual as the food coordinator for locally produced foods, who shall be responsible for implementing the locally produced foods purchasing plan;

developed a process for tracking the purchase of locally produced foods; and

complied with the reporting requirement under subsection (b) of this section.

A supervisory union that has satisfied the conditions under subdivision (2) of this subsection may, on or before January 15, 2022 or on or before January 15 of any year thereafter, apply to the Agency for the grant by submitting a certification, signed by the business manager for the supervisory union, that the supervisory union satisfies the conditions under subdivision (2) of this subsection.

If a supervisory union is eligible for a grant under subdivision (3) of this subsection, then the Agency shall make the grant payment, subject to appropriation, on or before the following March 31 after submission of the supervisory union’s application, which is due on or before January 15 of that year, which shall be equal to $0.15 per reimbursable school lunch served by the supervisory union in the prior school year through the National School Lunch Program. A supervisory union may apply for this grant and receive this grant funding only once.

A supervisory union that has received a grant under subdivision (4) of this subsection (c) may, on or before January 15, 2023 or on or before January 15 of any year thereafter, apply for a further grant by submitting to the Agency of Education information that demonstrates that at least 15 percent of the cost of all foods purchased or grown, raised, or produced by the supervisory union during the one-year period ending on June 30 of the previous year were local to Vermont as defined in

9 V.S.A. § 2465a(b)

, excluding:
(5) (A) A supervisory union that has received a grant under subdivision (4) of this subsection (c) may, on or before January 15, 2023 or on or before January 15 of any year thereafter, apply for a further grant by submitting to the Agency of Education information that demonstrates that at least 15 percent of the cost of all foods purchased or grown, raised, or produced by the supervisory union during the one-year period ending on June 30 of the previous year were local to Vermont as defined in

9 V.S.A. § 2465a(b)

, excluding:

foods purchased or grown, raised, or produced by the supervisory union that were used to provide catering services for which the supervisory union received compensation; and

fluid milk.

If a supervisory union grows, raises, or produces food, it shall assign a fair market value to that food for the purpose of reporting its cost.

A vendor that contracts with a supervisory union to supply food products shall certify to the supervisory union which of the food products supplied meet the definition of local to Vermont, taking into account the exclusions under subdivision 5(A) of this subsection (c).

If a supervisory union is eligible for a grant under subdivision (5) of this subsection, the Agency shall, on or before the following April 30 after submission of the supervisory union’s application, which is due on or before January 15 of that year, make the grant payment, subject to appropriation, which shall be determined as follows:

$0.15 per reimbursable school lunch served in the prior school year through the National School Lunch Program for supervisory unions purchasing at least 15 percent locally produced foods;

$0.20 per reimbursable school lunch served in the prior school year through the National School Lunch Program for supervisory unions purchasing at least 20 percent locally produced foods; or

$0.25 per reimbursable school lunch served in the prior school year through the National School Lunch Program for supervisory unions purchasing at least 25 percent locally produced foods.

A supervisory union may apply for and receive grant funding under subdivisions (5) and (6) of this subsection for each year that it qualifies for this grant funding. For applications covering the 2020-2021 school year, meals served through the Summer Food Service Program shall also be counted for this grant payment.

The Agency of Education may perform sample audits for any year that grant funds are paid to supervisory unions under subdivision (6) of this subsection to verify that information provided to the Agency under subdivision (5) of this subsection is accurate. If the Agency makes a grant payment under subdivision (6) of this subsection to a supervisory union that was based on inaccurate information reported by the supervisory union, the Agency may seek reimbursement from the supervisory union for an overpayment or reimburse the supervisory union for an underpayment or may adjust future grant amounts under this section to reflect the over- or underpayment.

On or before January 31, 2022 and annually thereafter, the Agency of Education shall submit to the Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Education and the House Committees on Agriculture and Forestry and on Education in an aggregated form:
(d) (1) On or before January 31, 2022 and annually thereafter, the Agency of Education shall submit to the Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Education and the House Committees on Agriculture and Forestry and on Education in an aggregated form:

the information received from supervisory unions regarding the percentage of locally produced foods, as the supervisory unions define them, that were reported under subsection (b) of this section; and

the percentage of locally produced foods, using the grant funding definition, that were reported under subdivision (c)(5) of this section and the amount of grant funding paid to supervisory unions under subdivision (c)(6) of this section in the prior school year.

The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

regarding expiration of required reports shall not apply to the reports required by this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 67

, § 7, eff. June 8, 2021.

§ 1265.
Exemption; public discussion.

The school board of a public school district that wishes to be exempt from the provisions of section 1264 of this title may vote at a meeting warned and held for that purpose to exempt itself from the requirement to offer either the school lunch program or the school breakfast program, or both, for a period of one year.

If a public school is exempt from offering a breakfast or lunch program, its school board shall conduct a discussion annually on whether to continue the exemption. The pending discussion shall be included on the agenda at a regular or special school board meeting publicly noticed in accordance with

1 V.S.A. § 312(c)

, and citizens shall be provided an opportunity to participate in the discussion. The school board shall send a copy of the notice to the Secretary and to the superintendent of the supervisory union at least ten days prior to the meeting. Following the discussion, the school board shall vote on whether to continue the exemption for one additional year.

On or before the first day of November prior to the date on which an exemption voted under this section is due to expire, the Secretary shall notify the boards of the affected school district and supervisory union in writing that the exemption will expire.

Following a meeting held pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the school board shall send a copy of the agenda and minutes to the Secretary and the superintendent of the supervisory union.

The Secretary may grant a supervisory union or a school district a waiver from duties required of it under this subchapter upon a demonstration that the duties would be performed more efficiently and effectively in another manner.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2003, No. 22

, § 1;

2011, No. 58

, § 22, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 133, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.